Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
CHAPTER 149 Forestry

149.005.
Kentucky Forest Resource Council. [Repealed.]

149.010.
Division of Forestry created — Powers — Rules and regulations.

There is hereby created and there shall be maintained within the Department for Natural Resources in the Energy and Environment Cabinet a Division of Forestry to supervise all forestry property and advance forest interests of the state through development of such property and interests. It shall initiate such projects as will promote public appreciation of forest protection and of reforestation; encourage tree planting in general and on the public highways in particular; grow, collect and distribute seedlings; form and foster junior forestry clubs; cooperate with local civic organizations in the care of trees and planting of more trees; provide for organized forest fire protection; cooperate with the federal government, state departments and landowners in the perpetuation of forests, the promotion of tree growth and the redemption of wasteland for agricultural purposes; and encourage an interest in forestry by correspondence, press, pamphlets, reports, moving pictures and organizations.

The director of the Division of Forestry with the approval of the secretary for energy and environment shall adopt and enforce such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the functions assigned the cabinet by law.

History.
2007h-2: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 40; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 17, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 141, effective July 15, 2010.

149.015.
Cabinet’s duties concerning blight-resistant chestnut tree seedlings.

There shall be established and maintained within the nursery or nurseries of the Energy and Environment Cabinet a section or sections for the propagation of blight-resistant chestnut tree seedlings. Such seedlings shall be distributed to landowners and citizens of the Commonwealth at reasonable cost and under and subject to such rules and regulations as may be established by the secretary for energy and environment.

History.
Enact. Acts 1956, ch. 122, § 1, effective May 18, 1956; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 142, effective July 15, 2010.

149.020.
Cabinet may acquire and dispose of land.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet may receive by donation, purchase, or lease lands for forestry purposes, and may convey, exchange, or lease said lands and may sell timber or other forest products thereon. In exercising this function the cabinet shall be exempted from any provision of KRS 45.301 or 45A.045, except with respect to the purchase, conveyance, exchange, or inventory of lands.

No land shall be purchased, leased, or received as a donation unless the title thereto is merchantable and has been approved by the Attorney General.

History.
2007i-17, 2007-18: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 201, § 1; 1966, ch. 255, § 142; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 226, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 450, § 68, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 496, § 41, effective July 13, 1990; 2010, ch. 24, § 143, effective July 15, 2010.

149.030.
Cabinet may establish reserves and lease land.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet may establish forest reserves in places where the land is suitable for the growth of timber and for the propagation of wild animal life. It may lease lands suitable for the purpose of growing timber and adapted to the propagation of game and wild animals. Such leases shall be for a term of not less than twenty (20) nor more than one hundred (100) years, and the rental shall not exceed the amount of state, county and school taxes on the property. The rentals shall be paid not later than December 31 in each year, out of funds accruing to the Energy and Environment Cabinet. All taxes shall be paid by the owners of the property prior to or at the time the rentals are paid by the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

History.
2007-18: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 144, effective July 15, 2010.

149.040.
Control over property — No adverse possession — Cooperation with governmental agencies.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet has complete control over all property acquired or leased by it. It may post all forest reserves and may eject all trespassers from property under its control.

No person shall injure any property under its control, or interfere in any manner with the management and supervision of the property.

No person shall acquire title by adverse possession to any property under control of the cabinet.

The cabinet may cooperate with any department of the state or the federal government, for the purpose of protecting and propagating fish and game.

History.
2007i-17, 2007i-23, 2007i-24, 2007i-26: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 145, effective July 15, 2010.

149.050.
Leasing and subleasing of lands by cabinet.

The cabinet may lease or rent portions of lands acquired by it to responsible persons, for cultivation and grazing, but in no event shall it lease or rent lands the use of which would be detrimental to the growth of timber or destructive of game or wild animal life. Proceeds resulting from the leasing of such lands shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

The cabinet may, with the consent of the owner of lands leased to it, sublease or rent any of the leased lands in a manner that will not interfere with the growth of timber or the propagation of game and wild animal life. If the lands are subleased or rented under these conditions, the cabinet and the owner shall divide the proceeds arising from the use of the lands, on a fifty-fifty basis, the cabinet’s one-half (1/2) shall be deposited into the State Treasury.

In exercising the functions of this section the cabinet shall be exempted from any provision of KRS 45.301 or 45A.045.

History.
2007i-21, 2007i-22: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 201, § 2; 1968, ch. 152, § 112; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 2, effective July 15, 1982; 1982, ch. 450, § 69, effective July 1, 1983; 1990, ch. 496, § 42, effective July 13, 1990.

149.060.
Sale of timber from leased lands.

If merchantable timber is taken from land leased to the Energy and Environment Cabinet, one-half (1/2) of the stumpage value of the timber shall be paid into the State Treasury and the other half (1/2) shall be paid to the lessor or his assigns. The sale of timber grown upon leased lands shall be made only by consent of all parties interested in the land or by court order. If all interested parties do not agree to sell the timber, the cabinet may, by a suit in equity, to which all persons interested shall be made parties, obtain an order directing the cabinet to sell merchantable timber on any leased lands.

History.
2007i-19: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 146, effective July 15, 2010.

149.070.
Counsel for cabinet.

When any action is instituted on behalf of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, the county and Commonwealth’s attorney shall represent it in the county in which the action is brought. The Attorney General shall have supervisory authority over all actions instituted for or against the cabinet.

History.
2007i-25: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 147, effective July 15, 2010.

149.080.
Forest wardens — Duties — Appointment — Deputies.

Forest wardens employed by the Energy and Environment Cabinet, shall assist in preventing, controlling and extinguishing forest fires, under direction of the cabinet. A forest warden must be a full-time employee of the Energy and Environment Cabinet who has been appointed by the secretary. A deputy forest warden can be a full-time or part-time employee of the cabinet or a non-employee who has been appointed by the secretary to have the same rights and privileges of a forest warden except the issuing of citations or arrests for violations of this chapter or collection of suppression costs.

History.
2007j-1: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 92, § 26; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 3, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 148, effective July 15, 2010.

149.083.
Interference with forestry officer or employee.

No person shall resist, obstruct, interfere with or threaten, or attempt to intimidate, or in any other manner interfere with any officer or employee of the Energy and Environment Cabinet in the discharge of his duties under the provisions of KRS Chapter 149.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 51(1); 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 149, effective July 15, 2010.

149.087.
Auto insurance for forestry employees.

The Energy and Environment Cabinet may secure such automobile liability insurance as will reasonably protect the interest of employees of the cabinet, particularly those employees driving trucks or heavy equipment in the conduct of official business.

Policies authorized by this section shall be purchased only in accordance with regulations prescribed by the commissioner of insurance and the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 54; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 150, effective July 15, 2010.

149.090.
Arrests — No trespass actions — Summoning help and equipment.

A forest warden, for violation of laws for the protection of the forest of the state, has the following arrest powers:

With a warrant;

Without a warrant any person he observes committing a misdemeanor or a felony; and

Without a warrant when he has reasonable grounds to believe that the person being arrested has committed a felony. No action for trespass shall lie against any forest warden, or person summoned by him, for crossing or working upon lands of another in connection with his duties as forest warden.

A forest warden may summon any resident of the state over eighteen (18) years of age who is physically able to assist in extinguishing forest fires. Inability or failure to pay such persons does not bar the authority of the warden to summon them.

A forest warden may require the use of horses, automobiles, tools and other equipment needed in extinguishing fires. Owners of said required equipment and materials shall receive reasonable compensation therefor, as determined by the forest warden. In case of disagreement upon the terms of compensation, the dispute shall be referred to the secretary for energy and environment, who shall make the final decision.

History.
2007j-2, 2007j-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 4, effective July 15, 1982; 2010, ch. 24, § 151, effective July 15, 2010.

149.093.
Citation or ticket given violators in lieu of arrest.

If the violation of any section of this chapter is a misdemeanor and is committed in the presence of a forest warden or other law enforcement officer, and there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person being cited will appear to answer the charge, the warden or officer may, in lieu of a physical arrest directed by KRS 149.090, issue a citation as authorized by KRS 431.015, 431.450, 431.452, and 431.455. The warden or officer may issue a warning without a penalty in lieu of a citation if the suspected offense is one cited in KRS 149.370, 149.375, 149.385, 149.390, 149.395, 149.400, 149.401, or 149.405.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 53; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1990, ch. 207, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 169, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 512, § 13, effective July 14, 2000.

149.097.
Rewards for apprehension of persons setting fires.

The secretary for energy and environment may offer rewards out of moneys, appropriated to the Energy and Environment Cabinet, for information leading to the apprehension and conviction of persons violating the laws relating to the setting of fires and forest fire control.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 23, § 52; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 393, § 50(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 152, effective July 15, 2010.

149.100.
Construction of KRS 149.110 and 149.120. [Repealed.]

149.110.
Owner to provide forest fire patrol, or pay cost of; effect of residence on land. [Repealed.]

149.120.
Patrol by state; liability of owner. [Repealed.]

149.130.
Federal forest reserve appropriations for county roads and schools.

All moneys paid to the state under an Act of Congress of May 23, 1908 (35 Stat. 260) as amended, and arising from any national forest reserve created in the state by the federal government, shall be paid over to the Finance and Administration Cabinet and be turned into the State Treasury. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall keep a separate account of all funds so received.

The treasurer of each county in which there is situated any part of a forest reserve owned by the United States shall ascertain and report to the Finance and Administration Cabinet the name and area of that part of each reserve located in his county. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall apportion the amount received by reason of each reserve among the counties in which the reserve is located, according to the area of the reserve in each county. If a fund is received from a reserve which lies in only one (1) county, it shall all be apportioned to that county. The Finance and Administration Cabinet shall draw a warrant on the State Treasury in favor of the treasurer of each county for the amount apportioned to that county.

The county treasurer shall place one-half (1/2) of the funds to the credit of the public roads of his county and the other half (1/2) shall be distributed among the school districts in the county according to the area of the reserve in each school district.

History.
2007L-1 to 2007L-4; repealed and reenact., Acts 1990, ch. 476, Pt. V, § 362, effective July 13, 1990.

149.135.
Definition of “timberland” as used in KRS 149.140 to 149.190. [Repealed.]

149.140.
Counties may cooperate with Division of Forestry in forest fire control; effect on other laws. [Repealed.]

149.150.
Establishment of county-wide forest fire protection. [Repealed.]

149.151.
County may pay cost of county-wide fire protection out of general fund or levy assessment on timberland. [Repealed.]

149.152.
Assessment of timberland; listing with tax commissioner. [Repealed.]

149.153.
Timberland to be entered on regular tax roll. [Repealed.]

149.154.
Computation of assessments; placing on tax bills. [Repealed.]

149.155.
Collection of assessments; receipts; when due; penalties. [Repealed.]

149.156.
County Forest Fire Protection Fund; use. [Repealed.]

149.157.
Protest against listing of property as timberland; hearing. [Repealed.]

149.160.
Duties of fire wardens — Account of expenses — Payment.

When the Energy and Environment Cabinet determines that a danger of forest fire exists in a county in which the statewide system of forest fire protection has been established under KRS 149.510 to 149.600, the cabinet shall respond to the forest fire danger and employ those persons and means as, in its judgment, are expedient and necessary to respond to the forest fire danger or to extinguish the fire, within the limits of the expense that it has been authorized to incur in its instructions from the secretary for energy and environment. The cabinet shall keep an itemized account of all expenses thus incurred and immediately send the account verified by affidavit to the secretary for energy and environment for examination. Upon approval by the secretary for energy and environment, the account shall be paid from such fund or funds as are available to the cabinet for such purpose. No such payment shall be made to any person who has intentionally started the fire or to any person whose negligence caused or contributed to the setting of the fire.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 204, § 3; 1966, ch. 23, § 41; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1998, ch. 169, § 6, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 153, effective July 15, 2010.

149.170.
No liability for trespass.

No action for trespass shall lie against the secretary for energy and environment, or any agent or employee of the Energy and Environment Cabinet, or any forest warden on account of lawful acts done in legal performance of their duties.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 204, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 154, effective July 15, 2010.

149.175.
Exemption from chapter’s requirements for persons certified by the Kentucky Prescribed Fire Council’s Burn Boss Program — Exceptions.

The Division of Forestry may exempt any person certified by the Kentucky Prescribed Fire Council’s Burn Boss Program from the requirements of this chapter, except that fires set under this section shall be in accordance with KRS 149.375 and shall not be conducted under a local burn ban or under a red flag warning day as determined by the National Weather Service.

Persons exempted under this section who set prescribed fires shall give notification of the burn to the Division of Forestry at least twenty-four (24) hours prior to the burn, and notify adjacent landowners and local emergency dispatch the day of the burn.

HISTORY:
2016 ch. 30, § 1, effective July 15, 2016.

149.180.
Collection of costs of firefighting from person responsible for fire — Disposition.

Whenever possible, the secretary for energy and environment shall collect the costs of firefighting done and approved as provided in KRS 149.160, from the person responsible for the origin of the fire by his negligence or intent. The recovered costs shall be deposited in a special fund in the Energy and Environment Cabinet. The recovered costs shall be repaid to the county in which the costs were incurred, if such county has fully paid its annual assessment to the statewide system as provided for in KRS 149.540 for the year in which the fire suppression costs were incurred. If a county is not eligible to receive the recovered costs, the money shall be used by the Division of Forestry to improve fire protection services. The funds so repaid to the county shall be placed in the county forest fire protection fund provided for in KRS 149.590. Any money in the Energy and Environment Cabinet’s, or its predecessor’s, special fund upon July 15, 1998, that were not repaid to a county for having failed to fully pay its annual assessment, shall be used by the Division of Forestry to improve fire protection services. In the event the suppression cost is not collected, the Commonwealth’s attorney of the county in which the fire occurred shall institute and prosecute the necessary proceedings. Costs recovered under this section shall be ordered to be paid directly to the Energy and Environment Cabinet. The court shall not direct that the costs be paid through the circuit clerk.

History.
Enact. Acts 1946, ch. 204, § 5; 1948, ch. 202, § 12; 1966, ch. 23, § 42; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 1982, ch. 142, § 5, effective July 15, 1982; 1998, ch. 169, § 5, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 183, § 11, effective August 1, 2002; 2010, ch. 24, § 155, effective July 15, 2010.

149.190.
Payments by counties to Division of Forestry; computation; crediting and use; liability of county; settlement of disputes as to acreage. [Repealed.]

149.200.
Power of county to acquire public forest. [Repealed.]

149.210.
Notice of meeting of fiscal court to consider acquisition of forest. [Repealed.]

149.220.
Order for purchase of forest lands — Source of payment. [Repealed.]

149.230.
Tax levy — Appropriations. [Repealed.]

149.240.
Acceptance of gift or devise of lands for forest. [Repealed.]

149.250.
Planting of trees — Use of revenue from sale of timber. [Repealed.]

149.260.
Preservation of forest — Use for recreational purposes. [Repealed.]

149.270.
Supervision of county forest — Employees — Cooperation of division of forestry — Cost of operation. [Repealed.]

149.280.
Forestry management under cooperative agreements — Payment of cost of services — Use of proceeds.

The secretary for energy and environment, or his authorized agent, may, upon request, and whenever he deems it essential to the best interests of the people of the Commonwealth, cooperate with counties, cities, corporations, institutions or individuals in preparing plans for the protection, management and replacement of trees, woodlands and timber tracts, under an agreement that the parties obtaining such assistance pay at least the field expenses of the men employed in preparing said plans. Services rendered under this cooperative plan may include the designation of trees for sale or removal, measuring or estimating the commercial volume contained in the trees designated, marketing advice, and general forestry advice concerning the management of the landowner’s forest.

When services are rendered under this section, the landowner or his agent, upon presentation of a statement, shall pay to the Energy and Environment Cabinet, within thirty (30) days of receipt of the statement, the amount due. The amounts so collected by the Energy and Environment Cabinet shall be paid into the State Treasury and shall be credited to a special fund for forest management and marketing, and, with such other funds as may be appropriated by the General Assembly, or contributed by the United States or any governmental or private agency for such purposes, shall be used and disbursed by the Energy and Environment Cabinet for such purpose.

History.
Enact. Acts 1948, ch. 204; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 156, effective July 15, 2010.

149.290.
Fires not to be set without taking precautions to prevent spread. [Repealed.]

149.300.
Fires not to be set near woodland or brushland during certain months except during certain hours; exceptions. [Repealed.]

149.305.
Emergency proclamations. [Repealed.]

149.310.
Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact.

The Governor, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky, is hereby authorized to execute a compact in substantially the following form, with any one or more of the States of Alabama, Florida, Georgia, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia and West Virginia, and the General Assembly hereby signifies in advance its approval and ratification of such compact:

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 100, § 1.

SOUTHEASTERN INTERSTATE FOREST FIRE PROTECTION COMPACT

ARTICLE I.

The purpose of this compact is to promote effective prevention and control of forest fires in the Southeastern region of the United States by the development of integrated forest fire plans, by the maintenance of adequate forest fire fighting services by the member states, by providing for mutual aid in fighting forest fires among the compacting states of the region and with states which are party to other Regional Forest Fire Protection compacts or agreements, and for more adequate forest protection.

ARTICLE II.

This compact shall become operative immediately as to those states ratifying it whenever any two or more of the States of Alabama, Florida, Georgia, Kentucky, Mississippi, North Carolina, South Carolina, Tennessee, Virginia, and West Virginia, which are contiguous have ratified it and Congress has given consent thereto. Any state not mentioned in this article which is contiguous with any member state may become a party to this compact, subject to approval by the legislature of each of the member states.

ARTICLE III.

In each state, the state forester or officer holding the equivalent position who is responsible for forest fire control shall act as compact administrator for that state and shall consult with like officials of the other member states and shall implement cooperation between such states in forest fire prevention and control.

The compact administrators of the member states shall coordinate the services of the member states and provide administrative integration in carrying out the purposes of this compact.

There shall be established an advisory committee of legislators, forestry commission representatives, and forestry or forest products industries representatives which shall meet from time to time with the compact administrators. Each member state shall name one member of the Senate and one member of the House of Representatives who shall be designated by that state’s commission on interstate cooperation, or if said commission cannot constitutionally designate the said members, they shall be designated in accordance with laws of that state; and the Governor of each member state shall appoint two representatives, one of whom shall be associated with forestry or forest products industries to comprise the membership of the advisory committee. Action shall be taken by a majority of the compacting states, and each state shall be entitled to one vote.

The compact administrators shall formulate and, in accordance with need, from time to time, revise a regional forest fire plan for the member states.

It shall be the duty of each member state to formulate and put in effect a forest fire plan for that state and take such measures as may be necessary to integrate such forest fire plan with the regional forest fire plan formulated by the compact administrators.

ARTICLE IV.

Whenever the state forest fire control agency of a member state requests aid from the state forest fire control agency of any other member state in combating, controlling or preventing forest fires, it shall be the duty of the state forest fire control agency of that state to render all possible aid to the requesting agency which is consonant with the maintenance of protection at home.

ARTICLE V.

Whenever the forces of any member states are rendering outside aid pursuant to the request of another member state under this compact, the employees of such state shall, under the direction of the officers of the state to which they are rendering aid, have the same powers (except the power of arrest), duties, rights, privileges and immunities as comparable employees of the state to which they are rendering aid.

No member state or its officers or employees rendering outside aid pursuant to this compact shall be liable on account of any act or omission on the part of such forces while so engaged, or on account of the maintenance, or use of any equipment or supplies in connection therewith: provided, that nothing herein shall be construed as relieving any person from liability for his own negligent act or omission, or as imposing liability for such negligent act or omission upon any state.

All liability, except as otherwise provided hereinafter, that may arise either under the laws of the requesting state or under the laws of the aiding state or under the laws of a third state on account of or in connection with a request for aid, shall be assumed and borne by the requesting state.

Any member state rendering outside aid pursuant to this compact shall be reimbursed by the member state receiving such aid for any loss or damage to, or expense incurred in the operation of any equipment answering a request for aid, and for the cost of all materials, transportation, wages, salaries, and subsistence of employees and maintenance of equipment incurred in connection with such request: provided, that nothing herein contained shall prevent any assisting member state from assuming such loss, damage, expense or other cost or from loaning such equipment or from donating such service to the receiving member state without charge or cost.

Each member state shall provide for the payment of compensation and death benefits to injured employees and the representatives of deceased employees in case employees sustain injuries or are killed while rendering outside aid pursuant to this compact, in the same manner and on the same terms as if the injury or death were sustained within such state.

For the purposes of this compact the term employee shall include any volunteer or auxiliary legally included within the forest firefighting forces of the aiding state under the laws thereof.

The compact administrators shall formulate procedures for claims and reimbursement under the provisions of this article, in accordance with the laws of the member states.

ARTICLE VI.

Ratification of this compact shall not be construed to affect any existing statute so as to authorize or permit curtailment or diminution of the forest firefighting forces, equipment, services or facilities of any member state.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to limit or restrict the powers of any state ratifying the same to provide for the prevention, control and extinguishment of forest fires, or to prohibit the enactment or enforcement of state laws, rules or regulations intended to aid in such prevention, control and extinguishment in such state.

Nothing in this compact shall be construed to affect any existing or future cooperative relationship or arrangement between any federal agency and a member state or states.

ARTICLE VII.

The compact administrators may request the United States Forest Service to act as a research and coordinating agency of the Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact in cooperation with the appropriate agencies in each state, and the United States Forest Service may accept responsibility for preparing and presenting to the compact administrators its recommendations with respect to the regional fire plan. Representatives of any federal agency engaged in forest fire prevention and control may attend meetings of the compact administrators.

ARTICLE VIII.

The provisions of Articles IV and V of this compact which relate to mutual aid in combating, controlling or preventing forest fires shall be operative as between any state party to this compact and any other state which is party to a regional forest fire protection compact in another region: provided, that the legislature of such other state shall have given its assent to such mutual aid provisions of this compact.

ARTICLE IX.

This compact shall continue in force and remain binding on each state ratifying it until the legislature or the Governor of such state, as the law of such state shall provide, takes action to withdraw therefrom. Such action shall not be effective until six months after notice thereof has been sent by the chief executive of the state desiring to withdraw to the chief executives of all states then parties to the compact.

149.315.
Operative date of compact — Exchange of official documents.

When the Governor shall have executed a compact, as authorized by KRS 149.310, on behalf of the Commonwealth of Kentucky and shall have caused a verified copy thereof to be filed with the Secretary of State, and when said compact shall have been ratified by one or more of the states named in KRS 149.310, then said compact shall become operative and effective as between the Commonwealth of Kentucky and such other state or states. The Governor is hereby authorized and directed to take such action as may be necessary to complete the exchange of official documents between the Commonwealth of Kentucky and any other state ratifying said compact.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 100, § 2.

149.320.
Assent by General Assembly to mutual aid provisions of compacts.

The General Assembly hereby gives its assent to the mutual aid provisions of Articles IV and V of the South Central Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact in accordance with Article VIII of that compact relating to interregional mutual aid; and the General Assembly also hereby gives its assent to the mutual aid provisions of Articles IV and V of the Middle Atlantic Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact in accordance with Article VIII of that compact relating to interregional mutual aid.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 100, § 3.

149.325.
Compact administrator.

The secretary for energy and environment shall be the compact administrator representing the Commonwealth of Kentucky as provided for in Article III of the compact approved by KRS 149.310. The Energy and Environment Cabinet is hereby authorized to do any and all things required to make effective the provisions of the compact.

History.
Enact. Acts 1954, ch. 100, § 4; 1974, ch. 74, Art. III, § 13(3); 2010, ch. 24, § 157, effective July 15, 2010.